Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB900.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Pursuant to KRS 141.020(2)(a)2.d., the appropriations contained in this Act are supported solely
by funds from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 and shall not be identified as GF
appropriations when certifying the reduction conditions pursuant to KRS 141.020(2)(b) and (c).
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $5,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Agriculture budget unit to support economic development initiatives within the agriculture industry.
Section 3. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Department for Local
Government to be distributed to the Hart County Fiscal Court to construct a new wastewater pretreatment facility.
Section 4. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $11,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Frankfort to support construction of the Frankfort Convention
Center.
Section 5. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $70,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Louisville Metro Government and
allocated at the sole discretion of its Economic Development Department for the revitalization of downtown
Louisville to include the following projects:
(1) The Belevedere;
(2) Community Care Campus;
(3) Convention Center Corridor;
(4) LOUMED Campus;
(5) Downtown Vacant Buildings Revitalization/Downtown Development Fund; and
(6) Waterfront Amphitheater.
Section 6. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $45,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Water and Wastewater Assistance for
Troubled or Economically Restrained Systems Program.
Section 7. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $2,500,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Kentucky Talent Recruitment Grant Program Fund.
Section 8. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Economic Development budget
unit to provide funding to the Cincinnati/Northern Kentucky International Airport in the amount of $6,000,000 and
the Louisville Muhammad Ali International Airport in the amount of $4,000,000 to support incentives, including
airline revenue guarantees to compete for both domestic and international nonstop flight opportunities.
Section 9. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $25,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Economic Development budget unit to support the Kentucky Product Development Initiative.
Section 10. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $5,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Residential Infrastructure Revolving Loan Fund.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 11. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $2,500,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund.
Section 12. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $40,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to support approved mega-development projects of at least
$10,000,000, with an exception for certain economic development projects as recommended by the Cabinet based on
unique conditions of the county where the project may occur, including but not limited to the population, per capita
income, or county wages that are lower than the median for the state. These funds may be used to provide loans with
the ability for forgiveness upon approval by the Secretary to support infrastructure and access to power. The Cabinet
shall develop the terms and conditions of the loans and shall include requirements related to increased economic
development.
Section 13. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $50,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Economic Development budget unit to support the Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation
(GRANT) Program.
Section 14. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Operations and Support Services
budget unit in the Department of Education to be distributed to the Kentucky FFA Leadership Training Center to
support the Activity Center and classrooms.
Section 15. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $14,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Learning and Results Services budget unit to be distributed as supplemental funding as outlined in KRS 157.069.
Section 16. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Learning and Results Services
budget unit to be distributed to the Northern Kentucky Area Development District to support a school of innovation
pilot project in Covington and $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support two schools that the Kentucky Board of
Education shall approve for admission into the pilot project that meet eligibility criteria to the extent funds are
available. The Kentucky Department of Education shall distribute funds to approved applicants in amounts that match
the funds dedicated by the local school board on a dollar-for-dollar basis. The funds shall be distributed on a regular
schedule to the school district provided that the school district operates the school of innovation in accordance with
the approved application. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
Section 17. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $2,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Pediatric Cancer Research Trust Fund.
Section 18. Notwithstanding KRS 164.038(1)(d) to (g) and (7), there is hereby appropriated General Fund
moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $37,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 to the Endowed Research Fund within the Council on Postsecondary Education established in KRS
164.038. The Endowed Research Fund shall contain five consortium accounts. The funding shall be evenly
distributed across the five consortium accounts, with $1,500,000 allocated annually for five years to each research
consortium. Each consortium account shall be reserved for funding the research consortium assigned to the account
by the Council in accordance with subsection (2) of KRS 164.038. The Council may expend the interest on the
amounts appropriated under this section on the cost of managing the Endowed Research Fund. Notwithstanding KRS
45.229, moneys in the Endowed Research Fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse and shall carry forward to
the next fiscal year.
Section 19. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $8,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Eastern Kentucky University
budget unit to support start-up costs associated with an accredited osteopathic medicine program.
Section 20. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $42,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Eastern Kentucky University
budget unit for a requirement to retain a $42,000,000 escrow reserve amount to be able to move forward with an
accredited osteopathic medicine program.
Section 21. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Aviation budget unit in the

CHAPTER 142 3
Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to be distributed to the Bluegrass Airport to support the relocation of the air traffic
control tower and supporting infrastructure. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry
forward.
Section 22. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $11,400,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Aviation budget unit in the
Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to support grants to General Aviation airports. These funds shall be distributed in
equal shares among all eligible General Aviation airports.
Section 23. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $7,500,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
General Administration and Support budget unit in the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to implement the Short Line
Infrastructure Preservation Pilot Project. The Cabinet shall coordinate with and make grants to Class II and Class III
railroads to preserve and enhance existing rail lines and corridors, retain existing rail-served industries, and attract
new industries, and preserve and modernize Kentucky’s rail system. Funds from the pilot project shall be used for the
purpose of leveraging state matching dollars in partnership with participating railroads for the railroad federal grant
applications, equipment, construction, reconstruction, improvement, or rehabilitation of rail facilities or engineering
work associated with capital projects. No funds shall be expended from the pilot project unless matched with non-
state funds equaling at least 50 percent of the total amount for any individual project. No single project shall receive
more than $2,000,000 in grant funds from the pilot project. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any portion of these funds
that have not been expended by the end of fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into fiscal
year 2027-2028. The Kentucky Transportation Cabinet shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission
and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by September 1, 2026, detailing the disbursement of
funds in this subsection.
Section 24. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $15,100,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $14,500,000 to the General
Administration and Support budget unit in the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to improve public riverports within
Kentucky.
Section 25. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $75,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $155,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to the Highways budget unit in the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to support construction-ready projects with
the fund code of CRP in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan.
Section 26. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Economic Development budget
unit to support the establishment of a grant program for not-for-profit Community Development Financial Institutions
headquartered in Kentucky to use for Financial Products for the production of commercial real estate, community
facilities, and housing.
Section 27. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705) in the amount of $17,300,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Aviation budget unit in the
Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to be distributed to the Louisville Regional Airport Authority to leverage federal
grants and improve airfield capacity.
Section 28. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Kentucky Enterprise Fund established in KRS 164.6019.
Section 29. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to Blue North to support entrepreneurship and innovation
hubs.
Section 30. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $10,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Central Kentucky Business Park Authority to
support the regional collaboration between the Lexington-Fayette County Urban Government, the Madison County
Fiscal Court, the City of Berea, and the Scott County Fiscal Court.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 31. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to LifeSciKY for the Kentucky BioInnovation Fund.
Section 32. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to LifeSciKY to support facility maintenance.
Section 33. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Warren County Fiscal Court to
support a workforce talent recruitment pilot program in south central Kentucky.
Section 34. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Boone County Fiscal Court to support the construction of a new river
station along the Ohio River for the Boone County Water Rescue.
Section 35. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $8,000,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Bowling Green for the installation
of infrastructure, supporting facilities, and recreational amenities for the Riverfront Park.
Section 36. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Elizabethtown to support the
construction of the Elizabethtown Nature Center.
Section 37. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $11,000,000 in fiscal year
of the 2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for
Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Greenville to expand the wastewater treatment plant.
Section 38. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Grayson County Healthcare Foundation, Inc. to construct a multi-
purpose health, wellness, recreation, education, and workforce development facility.
Section 39. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Diocesan Catholic Children's Home to support infrastructure
upgrades and a transitional living community pilot program.
Section 40. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $890,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Fleming County Fiscal Court to purchase a
multi-site simulcast radio system.
Section 41. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $6,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Natural
Resources budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation Fund to complete six
conservation-related projects that are currently in the Fund's project pipeline.
Section 42. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,765,300 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Eddyville Riverport and Industrial Development Authority for the
rebuilding of a fertilizer warehouse.
Section 43. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Bell County Fiscal Court for the purchase of two new pumper fire
trucks.
Section 44. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $400,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS

CHAPTER 142 5
48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Floyd County Fiscal Court for
building updates at two senior citizen facilities.
Section 45. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $6,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to Hardin County Fiscal Court to construct the Hardin County Emergency
Services Center – Glendale.
Section 46. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Harlan County Fiscal Court for Black Mountain Off-Road Adventure
Area land acquisition.
Section 47. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,616,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Johnson County Fiscal Court for facility upgrades at the Hager Hill
Athletic Complex.
Section 48. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kenton County Fiscal Court to construct St. Vincent de Paul – NKY
in the City of Erlanger.
Section 49. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kenton County Fiscal Court
for infrastructure and economic development.
Section 50. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Aerospace Education Center,
Inc. d/b/a The Aviation Museum of Kentucky to construct a state-of-the-art aerospace education center in Lexington.
Section 51. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to Lexington-Fayette Urban County Government to support the Next
Generation Workforce Development Project.
Section 52. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $197,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the McLean County Fiscal Court to construct an aquatic play pad at
Myer Creek Park in Calhoun.
Section 53. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to Mt. Sterling Montgomery County Parks and Recreation to restore and
modernize the Montgomery County Parks System.
Section 54. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Nicholas County Fiscal Court to construct a new EMS station.
Section 55. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Pikeville Medical Center to construct a Childcare Academy.
Section 56. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,400,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to Pulaski County Fiscal Court to construct a Nancy Community Center in
the western part of Pulaski County.
Section 57. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Rosenwald Multicultural Center for a roof replacement.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 58. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Taylor County Fiscal Court for gas line improvements.
Section 59. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Webster County Industrial Development
Authority to support infrastructure development for the Sebree Springs Estates Project.
Section 60. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government to be distributed to the City of Georgetown for improvements to public roadways surrounding the
Legacy Run Commerce Park site.
Section 61. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Bullitt County Fiscal Court for Clearview Farm Extension water lines
and fire hydrants.
Section 62. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $7,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Bullitt County Fiscal Court for expansion of a wastewater plant in
Pioneer Village.
Section 63. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,452,400 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to Carlisle County Sanitation District #1 for sanitation plant upgrades.
Section 64. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,380,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Cadiz for the planning and design of a new wastewater treatment
plant.
Section 65. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $7,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $4,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Danville for Phase 2
Capacity Improvements at the Danville Wastewater Treatment Plant.
Section 66. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,300,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Eminence for a sewer force main for the Mulberry Pike/Arbor
View subdivision.
Section 67. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $18,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Maysville for a new regional water treatment plant serving
Mason, Fleming, Lewis, Robertson, Bracken, Nicholas, Harrison, and Pendleton Counties in the Buffalo Trace
region.
Section 68. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,800,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Olive Hill for the purchase of leak detection equipment and
replacement of the Garvin Hill Pump Station.
Section 69. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $6,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Clark County Sanitation District for extension of sanitary sewer to
several hundred unserved residents in western Clark County and retirement of two wastewater package treatment
plants located at Yorktowne Mobile Home Park and Verna Hills Subdivision in the U.S. 60/Rockwell Road Corridor.
Section 70. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $10,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Crittenden-Livingston County Water District to support enlarging
treatment capacity and the distribution system.

CHAPTER 142 7
Section 71. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $6,600,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Monroe County Water District for a comprehensive water systems
improvement project.
Section 72. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,545,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the North Shelby Water Company for Flat Creek water line extension.
Section 73. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $6,313,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Campbellsville for wastewater treatment plant improvements.
Section 74. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,118,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Clinton for wastewater system improvements.
Section 75. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Wolfe County Sanitation District for Phase I and Phase II of the Hazel
Green wastewater treatment project.
Section 76. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $10,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the School Facilities and
Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Marion County Board of Education for construction of
a new Lebanon Elementary School.
Section 77. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS
48.705 to the Department for Public Health budget unit to provide funding for a Kentucky Parkinson's Disease
research registry.
Section 78. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,200,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System budget unit for the Glendale Training Center at Elizabethtown Community and Technical
College.
Section 79. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Office of the Secretary
budget unit under the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to Breckinridge County United Economic
Development for continued support of an outdoor amphitheater overlooking Rough River Lake.
Section 80. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Parks budget unit under
the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to Natural Bridge State Park for dredging of Hoedown
Island Lake.
Section 81. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Parks budget unit under
the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to Breaks Interstate Park for development of an RV site on
Wolfpen Branch.
Section 82. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $350,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Tourism budget unit
under the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to the London-Laurel County Tourist Commission for
a feasibility study and preliminary design work for an outdoor venue, racetrack, and RV park in Laurel County near
Hal Rogers Parkway.
Section 83. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,750,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Aviation budget unit
under the Transportation Cabinet to be distributed to the Georgetown - Scott County Regional Airport Community
Protection Initiative for improvements at the Georgetown - Scott County Regional Airport. These funds shall not be
used for electric vehicle charging stations.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 84. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Aviation budget unit
under the Transportation Cabinet to be distributed to the London-Corbin Airport Board for London-Corbin Airport
terminal rehabilitation.
Section 85. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Aviation budget unit
under the Transportation Cabinet to be distributed to the London-Corbin Airport Board for London-Corbin Airport
tornado recovery.
Section 86. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Ballet to support touring infrastructure, facility
improvements, and restoring live music at performances.
Section 87. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Newport to support the installation of an LED lighting system
on the Purple People Bridge.
Section 88. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,900,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Owensboro to support the development of the Massie
Industrial Site in West Owensboro.
Section 89. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $300,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Office of the Secretary
budget unit under the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to the Owensboro Museum of Fine Art to
support the construction of an expansion of the ARTLAND II Education Annex.
Section 90. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $295,800 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Pulaski County Fiscal Court to support the completion of the
Bolthouse Ridge project.
Section 91. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,607,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Connect Community Village to support the continued development
of veteran housing and program infrastructure in Kentucky.
Section 92. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Boyle County Fiscal Court to support the US 150 Corridor project to
expand water capacity, improve system resiliency, and support long-term economic growth in Lincoln, Rockcastle
and Garrard Counties.
Section 93. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $17,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Albany to support construction of a new water treatment plant.
Section 94. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the city of Greensburg to support community revitalization through
property acquisition, cleanup, engineering, design, and construction.
Section 95. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Green County Fiscal Court to support the renovation of the Green
County Courthouse and the completion of various walk/bike trails.
Section 96. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $75,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Hart County Fiscal Court to support the maintenance and
preservation of the historical Woodson House and Battle for the Bridge Preserve.

CHAPTER 142 9
Section 97. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $10,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Glasgow to construct a regional sports complex.
Section 98. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Metro Government to support the comprehensive
revitalization of the 4th & Oak Corridor through infrastructure upgrades, preservation of historic assets, and
enhancement of the pedestrian environment.
Section 99. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Metro Government to support the redevelopment of a
brownfield into affordable housing units.
Section 100. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $578,400 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Taylorsville Main Street Program to support the completion of Phase
V of the Main Street Beautification Project.
Section 101. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,937,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,783,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority unit to be distributed to the South Woodford County Water
District for water line replacements and upgrades.
Section 102. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Office of the Secretary
budget unit under the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to Shakertown at Pleasant Hill Kentucky,
Inc. to support the modernization of essential infrastructure at Shaker Village of Pleasant Hill.
Section 103. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $157,500 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority unit to be distributed to the City of Cloverport for lead service line inventory replacement.
Section 104. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,435,500 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Meade County Water District for water
distribution mains replacement, including new hydrants and valves.
Section 105. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Union County Fiscal Court to support water plant repairs in the City of
Sturgis.
Section 106. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Natural
Resources budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Division of Forestry to support the maintenance of horse
trails at Pennyrile Forest State Park.
Section 107. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department of Parks
budget unit to be distributed to Audubon State Park to support the acquisition of land for the purpose of expanding of
campgrounds and extending electrical.
Section 108. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $150,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Harbor House Henderson to support the
continued construction of the Harbor House Men’s Homeless Shelter in Henderson.
Section 109. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Office of the Secretary budget unit under the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed to The
Kentucky Center for African American Heritage to support programming expenses, deferred maintenance expenses,
and staffing.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 110. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Lexington Children’s Theatre to support
facility repairs and improvements.
Section 111. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $9,200,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Operations and Support
Services budget unit under the Kentucky Department of Education to be distributed to the Christian County Chamber
of Commerce to support the expansion of critical water infrastructure in the City of Oak Grove.
Section 112. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $504,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Christian County Board of Education to purchase vehicles and
provide equipment for the Christian County Public Schools school-based law enforcement agency.
Section 113. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,900,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Powell County Fiscal Court to support the Red River Wastewater
Authority’s wastewater treatment plant equipment replacement project.
Section 114. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Aviation
budget unit to be distributed to the Perry County Fiscal Court to support the Wendell H. Ford Airport runway
expansion project.
Section 115. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $320,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Knox County Industrial Development Authority for Knox County
land acquisition.
Section 116. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development
budget unit to be distributed to the Southeast Kentucky Industrial Development Authority to support site
development and improvement within the Southern Kentucky Industrial Business Park.
Section 117. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Whitley County Fiscal Court to support the jail renovation and
expansion project.
Section 118. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Williamsburg for a water tank replacement.
Section 119. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $7,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department of Aviation
budget unit to be distributed to the Williamsburg-Whitley County Airport to support the runway addition project.
Section 120. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Historical
Society budget unit to be distributed to the McCreary County Heritage Foundation to support the Stearns
revitalization project.
Section 121. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the McCreary County Fiscal Court to support the Cumberland Falls Water
and Sewer Project.
Section 122. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Knox County Fiscal Court for a sewer line extension at Gilliam Hill
Industrial Park.
Section 123. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local

CHAPTER 142 11
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Barbourville to purchase a county-wide emergency warning
system.
Section 124. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Knox County Utility Commission to replace a 200,000 gallon water
tank.
Section 125. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $550,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Knox County Fiscal Court for a water line extension at Harp Creek.
Section 126. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Jackson County Fiscal Court to support Phase II of the Jackson
County Park Project.
Section 127. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Jackson County Fiscal Court for the renovations and mold
remediation at the Old Jackson County Courthouse.
Section 128. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $950,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Clay County Fiscal Court to support North Manchester Water District
reconciliation.
Section 129. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $200,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Volunteers of America Mid-States to support operations at the Clay
County Freedom House.
Section 130. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development
budget unit to be distributed to One Clay County for an economic development and tourism initiative.
Section 131. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $25,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Historical
Society budget unit to be distributed to the Clay County Historical Society for building improvement and expansion.
Section 132. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Manchester for a water line replacement at Horse Creek.
Section 133. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Clay County Fiscal Court to construct a water intake system.
Section 134. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the School Facilities and
Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Clay County School Board to support renovations at
Paces Creek Elementary School.
Section 135. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Booneville to support a community and business
revitalization initiative.
Section 136. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $220,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Council on Postsecondary
Education budget unit to be distributed to the National Stem Cell Foundation to provide matching funds for research.
Section 137. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Owsley County Fiscal Court for Booneville Industrial Building
upgrades.
Section 138. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,300,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the University of Louisville to
establish a Literacy and Numeracy clinic in West Louisville.
Section 139. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,300,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the School Facilities and
Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the McCreary County School District for the construction
of an access road at McCreary Central High School.
Section 140. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Owsley County Fiscal Court to support the Owsley County Fire
Station rehabilitation and modernization project.
Section 141. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Clay County Fiscal Court to construct an Emergency Operations
Center and purchase equipment.
Section 142. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for
Community Based Services budget unit to be distributed to Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky to support operations at
Upstream Academy.
Section 143. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,034,500 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for
Environmental Protection budget unit to be distributed to the Wood Creek Water District to support the completion of
sewer lines.
Section 144. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Council on Postsecondary
Education budget unit to be distributed to the Lexington Fayette Urban County Government to fund a scholarship
through the Ed Brown Society.
Section 145. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Ashland for repairs and renovations at the Paramount
Theater.
Section 146. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Ohio River Regional
Recreational Authority to support a capital and planning grant program.
Section 147. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to Project C.A.M.P., d/b/a The Center for Courageous Kids to support
construction of a new art barn and medical lodge at the Scottsville camp.
Section 148. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $404,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Allen County Fiscal Court to install a leachate collection system at
the Allen County Transfer Station.
Section 149. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $8,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Green County Fiscal Court to construct the Bluff Boom Indoor
Athletic Complex.
Section 150. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705

CHAPTER 142 13
to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation to
assist with the space economy in coordination with Space Tango.
Section 151. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $7,700,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to Western Kentucky University for information technology infrastructure upgrades.
Section 152. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the School Facilities Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Frankfort Independent School
District to support facilities maintenance and modernization.
Section 153. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development
budget unit to be distributed to Shaping Our Appalachian Region for talent attraction.
Section 154. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Manchester for the purchase of land and construction of a
new city hall.
Section 155. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Film Foundation to provide one-time startup funding for
workforce development.
Section 156. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the University of Louisville to
support the pursuit of National Cancer Institute (NCI) designation.
Section 157. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Jenkins to provide match for a Section 531 federal project.
Section 158. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kenton County Fiscal Court to support the Ohio Valley Voices
cochlear implant program.
Section 159. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $19,984,900 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic
Development budget unit to be distributed to the Lexington Blue Grass Airport to support an airport terminal
expansion.
Section 160. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,025,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,820,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Office of the Secretary budget unit under the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet to be distributed
to the Lexington Children’s Museum to support a facility expansion.
Section 161. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,034,500 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Trimble County Fiscal Court for land acquisition for a riverfront
development in downtown City of Milton.
Section 162. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Edmonton to support
wastewater treatment plant upgrades and improvements.
Section 163. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $150,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Greenup County Fiscal Court to support the
development and expansion of Load Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. The Greenup County Fiscal Court or the Load
Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. shall provide a 10 percent match.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 164. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $600,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Greenup County Fiscal Court to support water and sewer upgrades.
Section 165. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,200,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development budget unit, to work in collaboration with the Powell County Fiscal
Court, to support upgrades, improvements, and development of the Clay City Industrial Park.
Section 166. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Hardin County Fiscal Court to support
water upgrades.
Section 167. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the School Facilities
Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Lyon County Board of Education to support
improvements to school facilities.
Section 168. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $7,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Hazard to support upgrades and improvements for water and
wastewater systems.
Section 169. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Bluegrass Center for Autism to support
operations.
Section 170. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Bardstown to support upgrades to water systems.
Section 171. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Boyle County Fiscal Court to purchase and upgrade fire equipment.
Section 172. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Madison County Fiscal Court to support the Redeeming Hope
therapeutic foster home.
Section 173. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $200,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Madison County Fiscal Court to support the operations of the One-
Stop Resource and Referral Hub of Madison County. The appropriation set out in this section shall require a dollar-
for-dollar match.
Section 174. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $120,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Gateway Area Development District to support the Regional Kitchen.
Section 175. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Laurel County Fiscal Court
to support upgrades, replacement, and construction of the fairgrounds.
Section 176. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,225,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Leslie County Fiscal Court to support
water and sewer upgrades.
Section 177. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $755,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Milton to support water and sewer upgrades.

CHAPTER 142 15
Section 178. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Knott County Water and Sewer District
to support upgrades to water and wastewater systems.
Section 179. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Economic Development budget unit, to work in collaboration with the Magoffin County Fiscal Court, to support
the acquisition of and upgrades for an industrial park.
Section 180. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Providence to support water
upgrades.
Section 181. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the National Society of the Sons of the
American Revolution to support the creation of the education center.
Section 182. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Henderson Water Utility to support utility upgrades.
Section 183. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development budget unit, to work in collaboration with the City of Lawrenceburg, to
support a regional economic development project.
Section 184. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $37,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Ludlow Heritage Museum to support operations.
Section 185. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $852,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Wingo to upgrade water systems.
Section 186. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $9,100,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Warren County Board of Education to support the IMPACT Center
for Leadership and Innovation.
Section 187. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Mercer County Fiscal Court
to support water and sewer upgrades at the Wilkinson Megasite.
Section 188. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Monticello to
support the replacement or construction of a gas line.
Section 189. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $200,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Wayne County Fiscal Court to support the
design and construction of a county road for the Wayne County Airport.
Section 190. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Easterseals Redwood to support
operations.
Section 191. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $600,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Rockcastle County Fiscal
Court to support community development, emergency management, and infrastructure upgrades.
Section 192. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Falmouth to support
the design and construction of a transmission line.
Section 193. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Bourbon County Fiscal Court to support continued development of a
park.
Section 194. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Nicholasville to support the 24" Parallel Transmission Main
Water Improvements project.
Section 195. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,450,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Edmonson County Fiscal Court to support upgrades and
improvements to a park.
Section 196. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $950,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Whitley County Fiscal Court to support the development of an
innovation hub.
Section 197. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Lewis County Fiscal Court to support upgrades at the Lewis County
Recreational Park. The appropriation set out in this section shall require a ten percent match.
Section 198. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities budget unit to be distributed to Down Syndrome
of Louisville to support operations.
Section 199. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Green River Valley Water District to support water system upgrades.
Section 200. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $4,700,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Livingston County Fiscal
Court to support regional wastewater improvements.
Section 201. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,800,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development
budget unit, to work in collaboration with the Clark County Fiscal Court, to support an economic development
initiative.
Section 202. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Greenville to support water and
sewer upgrades and improvements. The appropriation set out in this section shall require a 50 percent match.
Section 203. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Gateway Area Development District,
in coordination with the Morgan County Fiscal Court, to support an economic development initiative in Morgan
County.
Section 204. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $550,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the

CHAPTER 142 17
Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Pulaski County Fiscal Court to support
upgrades for a building which is used by OakPointe Centre in conjunction with a food pantry.
Section 205. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Community Based Services budget unit to be distributed to the Family Nurturing Center to
support operations.
Section 206. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $550,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Lincoln Trail Area Development District to
support a childcare initiative.
Section 207. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Ohio County Fiscal Court to support the
Cliff Hagan Boys and Girls Club of Ohio County.
Section 208. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Allen County Water District to support
water and sewer upgrades.
Section 209. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $4,556,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Daviess County Fiscal
Court to construct an emergency operations facility.
Section 210. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development budget unit, to work in collaboration with the Boyd County Fiscal Court,
to support upgrades and improvements of the Camp Landing Entertainment District.
Section 211. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Cumberland Valley Area Development District to support an indoor
arena for an equine therapy program at the Appalachian Children's Home.
Section 212. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $325,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Barbourville Utility Commission to support
utilities improvements.
Section 213. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department of
Agriculture budget unit to be distributed to the Cumberland Valley Area Development District to support the
construction of office space and equipment storage. The Cumberland Valley Area Development District shall work in
conjunction with the Knox County Conservation District.
Section 214. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Jackson County Fiscal Court to support
improvements and upgrades to the Jackson County Fairgrounds.
Section 215. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $10,000,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic
Development budget unit to be distributed to the Christian County Fiscal Court for the purchase of debt held by
Planters Bank against real estate owned by Hopkinsville Industrial Foundation in or around Commerce Park II. The
Cabinet for Economic Development shall arrange normal and ordinary terms for repayment to the Commonwealth of
Kentucky for a term of ten years. No interest shall accrue at any time during the term of the loan.
Section 216. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Trenton to support upgrades to
wastewater systems.
Section 217. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Hopkins County Fiscal Court to support
the Hopkins County Industrial Authority in developing a site for economic development.
Section 218. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $75,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Madisonville to support roof construction for a community
center.
Section 219. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $15,000,000 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky
Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the LaGrange Utilities Commission to support water and
sewer upgrades.
Section 220. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,800,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,800,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Middlesboro to
support community development and flood mitigation.
Section 221. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $375,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Canopy KY to support operations.
Section 222. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $77,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the House of W.O.M.B., Women Overcoming Many Barriers,
Foundation, Inc. to support operations.
Section 223. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Paducah-McCracken County Riverport Authority to support the
Riverport West project.
Section 224. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance
Authority for use in supporting Kentucky tech start-up companies.
Section 225. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Owsley Brown Frazier Historical Arms Museum Foundation, Inc. to
support the 120: Cool KY Counties project.
Section 226. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Goodwill Kentucky to support an expansion
to a second location in Fayette County.
Section 227. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $6,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to Apple Patch Community, Inc. d/b/a Pillar for completion of a 72-unit
affordable housing community in Crestwood, Kentucky designed for adults with intellectual and developmental
disabilities.
Section 228. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $300,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS
48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Mount Vernon to support
the purchase of water meters and infrastructure improvements.
Section 229. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $550,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS

CHAPTER 142 19
48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Pineville to support water
and sewer upgrades.
Section 230. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,250,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Greater Kentucky and Southern Indiana
Chapter of the Alzheimer's Association to support research and operations in Kentucky.
Section 231. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,200,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Orchestra to support a statewide harmony tour.
Section 232. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Attorney General budget
unit to support the procurement of a vendor that will utilize data analytics to provide fraud and waste prevention and
detection services. Information gathered by the vendor shall be utilized by the Office of Medicaid Fraud and Abuse
Control for the purposes of investigating potential fraud. The information shall also be shared with the Legislative
Research Commission's Office of Health Data Analytics and the Office of Budget Review.
Section 233. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Logan County Fiscal Court to support the purchase and upgrades of a
regional radio system and equipment for Logan, Todd, and Christian Counties.
Section 234. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Dare to Care Food Bank to support the
construction of a new warehouse.
Section 235. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,750,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Metro Government to support site access improvements.
Section 236. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $4,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Kids Center for Pediatric Therapies to
support capital expansion.
Section 237. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Zoo to support
the grounds maintenance and expansion of programs.
Section 238. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Southwest Center for the Developmentally Disabled to support the
construction of accessible housing.
Section 239. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $20,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Daviess County Fiscal Court to support the Empowerment Academy
of Owensboro.
Section 240. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,200,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to Uspiritus to support operations
and the reopening of existing care facilities.
Section 241. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the J.B. Speed Art Museum to support the
completion of a renovation project.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 242. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Workforce Development budget unit to be distributed to Kentuckiana Works to support workforce
development programming.
Section 243. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Cedar Lake Foundation to support the care of individuals with
intellectual and developmental disabilities.
Section 244. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Center for the Arts budget unit to support capital upgrades.
Section 245. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Lincoln County Fiscal Court to support the construction and
improvement of the entrance to the Isaac Shelby Cemetery.
Section 246. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Rockcastle County Board of Education for facility support
infrastructure and associated equipment needs.
Section 247. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $77,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Melannaire Achievement Center to support operations.
Section 248. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Barkley Regional Airport to support capital
improvements
Section 249. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Owensboro-Daviess County Regional Airport to
support capital improvements.
Section 250. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS
48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Letcher County Fiscal Court for
water lines to Thunder Mountain.
Section 251. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $300,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Spencer County Fiscal Court to support renovations to a historical
site in collaboration with the Felix Grundy Stidger Historic Preservation Foundation.
Section 252. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Todd County Fiscal Court,
in collaboration with the Milliken Memorial Community House Association, to support site development, upgrades,
and renovation of the Milliken Memorial Community House.
Section 253. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $200,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Beaver Dam to support renovations
of the Beaver Dam Amphitheater.
Section 254. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Union County Fiscal Court to support the construction of an
emergency operations center.

CHAPTER 142 21
Section 255. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Harlan County Fiscal Court to support the wellness center.
Section 256. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $400,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Harlan County Fiscal Court to support upgrades to the Benham
Schoolhouse Inn.
Section 257. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $450,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Paducah, in collaboration with the Brooks Stadium
Commission, to support renovations and upgrades to the Brooks Stadium.
Section 258. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $150,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Paducah Cooperative Ministries to support programming and capital
improvements.
Section 259. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,400,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Kevil to support sewer upgrades and improvements.
Section 260. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $450,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Leadership Kentucky Foundation to support the BRIGHT Program
and shall be held in a segregated account and require a dollar-for-dollar match. Earnings from the account shall be
used for programming. Funds appropriated in this section shall not be used for administrative costs.
Section 261. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Garrard County Fiscal Court to support economic development as it
relates to water and sewer infrastructure. Funds appropriated in this section shall not be expended on roads.
Section 262. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $5,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Shelby County Fiscal Court
to support a healthcare facility.
Section 263. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Owensboro Municipal Utilities to support
utility improvements including implementation of smart meters.
Section 264. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Owensboro to support the Owensboro Symphony’s regional
education outreach initiative.
Section 265. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the School Facilities Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Todd County Board of Education
to support renovations and upgrades to facilities and general support.
Section 266. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Community Ventures Corporation to support community
development in Bourbon County.
Section 267. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Community Ventures Corporation to support community
development in Fulton County.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 268. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $5,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Garrard County Fiscal Court, in collaboration with Ephraim
McDowell Regional Medical Center, to support the construction of a free-standing emergency room.
Section 269. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $200,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Lincoln County Fiscal Court to support the Fort Logan master and
construction plan.
Section 270. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Volunteers of America to
support the Freedom House of Stanford.
Section 271. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Crofton to support facilities and
equipment upgrades at the Veterans Park and other city-owned facilities.
Section 272. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the School Facilities
Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Williamstown Independent Schools to support school
renovations.
Section 273. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,225,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Paducah-McCracken Joint Sewer Agency to support the sludge press
building project.
Section 274. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department of Veterans Affairs budget unit to be distributed to Kentucky Valor to support veterans’ services.
Section 275. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Erlanger to support the Eons
Adventure Park initiative.
Section 276. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS
48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the City of Harlan to support water
and sewer upgrades.
Section 277. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,300,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Cawood Water District to support the
water upgrades.
Section 278. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,750,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the Economic Development budget unit to be distributed to the Greater Owensboro Economic Development
Authority to support the Landing Entrepreneurship Center.
Section 279. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,546,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Daviess County Water District to support water and sewer upgrades.
Section 280. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Daviess County Fiscal Court to support the Green River Community
Food warehouse project.
Section 281. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $60,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local

CHAPTER 142 23
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Owensboro to support the Mentor Kids in Owensboro
program.
Section 282. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $600,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Lincoln County Fiscal Court to support the South Lincoln water
expansion on the Fishing Creek area.
Section 283. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Lincoln County Fiscal
Court to support economic development as it relates to water, sewer, and infrastructure. Funds shall not be expended
on roads.
Section 284. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the School Facilities Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Lincoln County Board of
Education to support educational upgrades and renovations to Lincoln County schools and facilities. The funds shall
not be expended on athletic facilities.
Section 285. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,500,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the School Facilities Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Garrard County Board of
Education to support educational upgrades and renovations to Garrard County schools and facilities.
Section 286. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Owensboro to support the Western Kentucky Botanical
Garden Event Center project.
Section 287. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $600,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Bell County Fiscal Court to support community and economic
development.
Section 288. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,900,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $2,130,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Rockcastle County
Industrial Authority to support land acquisition and site development.
Section 289. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Stanton, in collaboration with the Stanton Parks and
Recreation Board, for infrastructure and associated equipment needs at the Stanton city park.
Section 290. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $3,000,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Infrastructure
Authority budget unit to be distributed to the Western Rockcastle Water District to support the water infrastructure
upgrades.
Section 291. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $500,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the School Facilities Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the Russellville Independent School
District to support upgrades and renovations to school facilities and general support.
Section 292. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $2,000,000 in each
fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705
to the School Facilities Construction Commission budget unit to be distributed to the McCracken County Public
Schools to support the McCracken County High School career and technical education building addition.
Section 293. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $25,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services budget unit to support the cardiac arrest registry to enhance
survival.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 294. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to
the Department for Public Health budget unit to support the implementation of cardiopulmonary resuscitation training
to students.
Section 295. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $100,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Logan County Fiscal Court to support the Colonel Benjamin Logan
Chapter of the Sons of the American Revolution and its celebration and monument commemorating the 250th
anniversary of the United States.
Section 296. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $925,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Meade County Fiscal Court to support the Doe Valley dam integrity
and repairs project.
Section 297. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $210,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Graves County Fiscal Court to support river cleanup.
Section 298. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $928,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $772,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS
48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the City of Auburn to support site
development at the Auburn Business Park and other city-owned properties.
Section 299. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $1,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,100,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in
KRS 48.705 to the Facilities and Support Services budget unit in the Finance and Administration Cabinet to replace
the Buckhorn Lake State Park Marina. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prioritize this project to address
public safety at Buckhorn Lake State Park.
Section 300. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Economic Development
budget unit to support a rural workforce study conducted in collaboration with the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System, the Education and Labor Cabinet, and other strategic partners to identify and develop
strategies addressing Kentucky’s long-term rural workforce needs.
Section 301. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS
48.705 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be distributed to the Laurel County Fiscal Court to
construct a new fire station.
Section 302. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $250,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established in KRS 48.705 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the KY First Robotics, Inc. to support school programming.
Section 303. 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, subsec. (52) is amended to read as follows:
(52) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Department for Local Government budget unit to be
distributed to the City of Paducah to support the Build Ready Grant for the City of Paducah Infrastructure project.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward;
Section 304. 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, subsec. (179), at page 1765, as amended by 2025 Ky. Acts ch.
162, sec. 5, at page 1121, is further amended to read as follows:
(179) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Economic Development budget unit to be allocated to
Grayson County Fiscal Court for relocation of its county airport and to purchase acreage for a new industrial
development[the expansion of runways] to promote economic growth. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds
shall not lapse and shall carry forward;
Section 305. 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, subsec. (192), at page 1766, as amended by 2025 Ky. Acts ch.
117, sec. 37, subsec. 192, at page 717, is amended to read as follows:
(192) $6,000,000 in each fiscal year to the Community Based Services budget unit to be distributed to the
Life Learning Center to support an integrated pathway to treatment, rehabilitation, and community reintegration in

CHAPTER 142 25
partnership with a nonprofit located in Community Mental Health Region 13 or Region 14 to help administer
recovery and job placement services;
Section 306. Whereas the provisions of this Act provide ongoing support for state government agencies
and their functions, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the
Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version